Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1911 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State of Oklahoma hereby adopts the non-legally binding
Working Definition of Anti-Semitism adopted by the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance (IHRA) on May 26, 2016, including the
contemporary examples of anti-Semitism set forth therein,
exclusively as a tool and guide for training, education, and
HB1218 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

reco gnizing and combating anti-Semitic hate crimes or discrimination
and for tracking and reporting anti-Semitic incidents in this state.
B. The provisions of this act shall not be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution or the Oklahoma
Constitution.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/10/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.











HB1218 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.